Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-11] Special designation of hospital
sustainability program special fund. Notwithstanding section 37-53, and
any law or any administrative rule to the contrary, the specific purposes set
out in section 346G-4(c) are established as being exclusive uses of the
hospital sustainability program special fund. The hospital sustainability
program special fund shall not and may not be used for any other purposes,
notwithstanding any authority granted to the governor or any other state
official by any other statutory provisions relating to the allocation or
reallocation of funds. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 141, pt of
§1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L 2015, c 70, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next